North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06 Operators’ Licenses

39-06-01.
Operators must be licensed — Additional licensing — Penalty.

An individual, unless exempted in this section, may not drive any motor vehicle on a highway or on public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use in this state unless the individual has a valid license as an operator under this chapter or a temporary operator’s permit issued under chapter 39-20. An individual may not receive an operator’s license or a nondriver identification card until that individual surrenders to the director all operator’s licenses, permits, and nondriver photo identification cards issued to that individual by any state or country. If a license issued by another state is surrendered, the director shall notify the issuing state of the surrender. An individual may be issued either a valid operator’s license or a nondriver identification card at any one time, but not both.

An individual licensed as an operator may exercise the privilege granted by the license on any highway in this state and may not be required to obtain any other license to exercise the privilege by any political subdivision having authority to adopt police regulations, except that municipalities may regulate occupations and may regulate the operation of taxicabs under subsection 27 of section 40-05-01.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0601; S.L. 1961, ch. 257, § 1; 1963, ch. 277, § 2; 1975, ch. 339, § 2; 1977, ch. 354, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 4; 1989, ch. 460, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 3; 2017, ch. 256, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06-01.1.
Special provisions for minor operators.

The director shall cancel the operator’s license of an individual who has committed acts resulting in an accumulated point total in excess of five points as provided for a violation under section 39-06.1-10 if:

The acts or offenses were committed while the individual was a minor; and

The individual admitted the violation, was found to have committed the violation by the official having jurisdiction, or pled guilty to, was found guilty of, or adjudicated to have committed the offense.

The director shall cancel the operator’s license of an individual who has committed an alcohol-related offense or a drug-related offense while operating a motor vehicle if:

The offense was committed while the individual was a minor;

The individual was found to have committed the offense by the official having jurisdiction, or pled guilty to, was found guilty of, or adjudicated to have committed the offense;

The offense created an imminent risk of injury to another individual;

A lesser penalty would be ineffective to prevent future risk to another individual; and

The official having jurisdiction orders the director to cancel the operator’s license.

If an individual has had that individual’s license to operate a motor vehicle canceled under subsection 1 or 2, the director shall deem that individual to have never have had any license to operate a motor vehicle and may not issue any license to operate a motor vehicle other than an instruction permit or a restricted instruction permit after the completion of any period of suspension or revocation. After the issuance of an instruction permit or restricted instruction permit, the director may not issue any other operator’s license to that individual until that individual:

Meets the requirements of section 39-06-17. The driver education requirement may be met through either an internet course or successfully completing a course at an approved commercial driver training school meeting the requirements of chapter 39-25; and

Satisfies all other requirements that apply to that individual for that operator’s license.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 341, § 3; 2001, ch. 338, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 4; 2015, ch. 275, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 284, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 275, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-06-01.2.
Anatomical gifting.

The application for nondriver photo identification cards and operator’s licenses must include a statement making an anatomical gift and provide for the voluntary identification of the applicant as a donor under chapter 23-06.6. In addition, identification of the applicant as a donor under chapter 23-06.6 may be completed by an online registry approved by the director. If the applicant’s donor intention is made by the online registry, the intention must be recorded on the applicant’s record. The intention is not required on the identification card or license unless a duplicate card is obtained or at the time of renewal. The department may not be held civilly or criminally liable for any act or omission in implementing and maintaining the online registration of donors.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 271, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 5.

39-06-01.3.
Compliance with federal selective service requirement.

Upon submission of an application for an initial, renewal, or duplicate instruction permit, operator’s license, or a nondriver identification card by a man at least eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-six, the department shall provide for the registration of the applicant with the selective service system.

The department shall provide language on the application informing the applicant his signature on the application serves as an acknowledgment the applicant already has registered with the selective service system or the applicant consents to registration.

An applicant who objects to registration for conscientious, religious, or other grounds may contact the selective service system for alternative options.

The department shall forward the applicant’s necessary personal information to the selective service system for registration.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 314, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-06-02.
Individuals who are exempt from having an operator’s license — Resident defined.

The following individuals are exempt from having an operator’s license:

An employee of the United States government while operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to that government and being operated on official business.

A nonresident who is at least sixteen years of age, who has in that individual’s immediate possession a valid operator’s license issued to that individual in that individual’s home state or country.

A member of the armed forces of the United States while that individual is stationed in North Dakota, if that individual has a valid current operator’s license from another state.

An individual over sixteen years of age who becomes a resident of this state and who has in possession a valid operator’s license issued to that individual under the laws of some other state or country or by military authorities of the United States for a period of not more than sixty days after becoming a resident of this state.

A member of the North Dakota national guard operating any military vehicles as authorized by a national guard operator’s license while on duty.

For purposes of this chapter, an individual is deemed a resident of this state when the individual has lived in the state for ninety consecutive days, unless the individual is a nonresident student, a tourist, or a member of the armed forces.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0602; S.L. 1959, ch. 291, § 1; 1963, ch. 277, § 3; 1983, ch. 429, § 1; 1989, ch. 460, § 2; 1997, ch. 332, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 6; 2017, ch. 262, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Extended term of license held by members of armed forces, see § 39-06-19.1.

39-06-03.
No operator’s license to certain individuals.

The director may not issue an operator’s license:

To an individual who is under the age of sixteen years, except that the director may issue an instructional permit under section 39-06-04, a restricted permit under section 39-06-05, or a license under section 39-06-17.

To an individual whose license has been suspended or revoked in this state or in any other state during the suspension, except under section 39-06.1-03 or 39-06.1-11, or to any person whose license has been revoked, except under sections 39-06-35, 39-06-36, and 39-06.1-11.

To an individual who has previously been adjudged to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental disability or disease and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency by the methods provided by law.

To an individual who is required by this chapter to take an examination, unless the individual has successfully passed such examination.

To an individual who is required under the laws of this state to deposit security or file proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited the security or filed the proof.

To an individual if the director has good cause to believe that the individual by reason of physical or mental disability would not be able to operate a motor vehicle with safety.

To an individual when the director has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by that individual would be inimical to public safety or welfare.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0603; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 2; 1969, ch. 340, § 1; 1973, ch. 301, § 18; 1975, ch. 339, § 3; 1977, ch. 348, § 2; 2005, ch. 328, § 1; 2009, ch. 328, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 7; 2015, ch. 268, § 4, effective April 15, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

Collateral References.

Age requirements for licensing of motor vehicle operators, validity, construction, and application of, 86 A.L.R.3d 475.

39-06-03.1.
Nondriver photo identification card issued by director — Release of information — Penalty — Public awareness.

The director shall issue a nondriver color photo identification card to any resident of this state who fulfills the requirements of this section. An application for an identification card must be made on a form furnished by the director. Within thirty days from receipt of a complete application that includes the applicant’s social security number, unless the applicant is a nonimmigrant who is not eligible for a social security number, the director shall determine whether to issue and, if appropriate, issue a nondriver photo identification card to an applicant. The director may not withhold the issuance of a nondriver color photo identification card without reasonable cause. If the applicant is under the age of eighteen or at least the age of eighteen and under the age of twenty-one, the photo must be against the same color background required on a motor vehicle operator’s license for an operator of that age. Subject to section 39-06-19, identification cards expire eight years from the date of issue and may be renewed. The application must contain other information as the director may require to improve identity security.

The director shall issue a nondriver color photo identification card to any resident who at the time of application is not a citizen of the United States and who fulfills the requirements of this section. The identification card must be designed in a manner to clearly make the card distinguishable from a similar card issued to a citizen of the United States and resident of this state. The card may be replaced with a card issued to a citizen of this country and resident of this state only when proof of United States citizenship is provided by the individual and any applicable replacement fee listed in section 39-06-49 is paid.

To confirm the identity, date of birth, and legal presence of the applicant, the director or examining officer shall require satisfactory evidence be provided by the applicant. Satisfactory evidence includes a certified copy of the applicant’s birth certificate or other evidence reasonably calculated to permit the determination of the date of birth, identification, and legal presence of the applicant by the director or examining officer. The director may require an applicant for an identification card to provide a social security card and proof of residence address.

The application fee is listed in section 39-06-49. Except for a duplicate or replacement card, the director may not charge a fee to provide a nondriver photo identification card to an eligible applicant.

Any information obtained by the director from an applicant for the issuance, renewal, or replacement of an identification card may not be released unless allowed under section 39-16-03.

The director may advertise the availability and the use of the card.

Identification cards issued under this section are sufficient identification for all identification purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 342, § 1; 1983, ch. 429, § 2; 1987, ch. 440, § 2; 1987, ch. 457, § 1; 1987, ch. 458, § 1; 1993, ch. 375, § 3; 1995, ch. 370, § 1; 1999, ch. 339, § 1; 1999, ch. 340, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 3; 2007, ch. 322, § 1; 2007, ch. 323, § 1; 2007, ch. 237, § 4; 2009, ch. 329, § 1; 2009, ch. 330, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 5; 2013, ch. 167, § 7; 2013, ch. 291, § 8; 2017, ch. 152, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 256, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 39-06-03.1 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 10 of Chapter 152, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1369; and Section 3 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1128.

39-06-04.
Class D instruction permit.

Any resident of this state who is at least fourteen years of age may apply to the director for a class D instruction permit.

The director may issue a class D instruction permit that entitles the applicant while having the permit in the permittee’s immediate possession to drive a motor vehicle upon the public highways, if the individual:

Has successfully passed a standard written rules of the road knowledge test prescribed by the director;

Has successfully passed a vision examination; and

Has the written approval of the individual’s parent or legal guardian.

The permittee must be accompanied by an individual with a class A, B, C, or D license in a vehicle allowed to be operated with a class D license, who is at least eighteen years of age, who has had at least three years of driving experience, and who is occupying a seat beside the driver. An individual other than the supervising driver and the permitholder may not be in the front seat unless the vehicle has only a front seat, in which case, the supervising driver must be seated next to the permitholder.

An individual who is not yet eighteen years of age is not eligible for a class D license until that individual has had an instruction permit issued for at least six months or at least twelve months if under the age of sixteen. The director may recognize an instruction permit issued by another jurisdiction in computing the six-month or twelve-month instructional period.

The permittee may not operate an electronic communication device to talk, compose, read, or send an electronic message while operating a motor vehicle that is in motion unless the sole purpose of operating the device is to obtain emergency assistance, to prevent a crime about to be committed, or in the reasonable belief that an individual’s life or safety is in danger.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0604; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 3; 1977, ch. 343, § 1; 1987, ch. 458, § 2; 1989, ch. 460, § 3; 1999, ch. 341, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 9; 2013, ch. 298, § 1.

Collateral References.

Liability, for personal injury or property damage, for negligence in teaching or supervision of learning driver, 5 A.L.R.3d 271.

39-06-05.
Restricted instruction permit — When instruction permit not required — Driver’s training course.

The director upon receiving proper application may issue a restricted instruction permit effective for a school year or more restricted period to an applicant who is at least fourteen years of age and enrolled in a commercial driver training course that includes practice driving and which is approved by the director of the highway patrol under chapter 39-25. The restricted instruction permit entitles the permittee when the permittee has the permit in the permittee’s immediate possession to operate a motor vehicle with an approved instructor occupying a seat beside the permittee and on a designated highway or within a designated area.

Subject to subdivision b, any student enrolled in behind-the-wheel driver’s training through a high school program approved by the superintendent of public instruction may operate a motor vehicle, under the supervision of a driver training instructor certified by the superintendent of public instruction, without a permit or license to operate a motor vehicle, if the school district sponsoring the driver’s training program has an insurance policy covering any damage that may be done by a student while operating the vehicle and proof of coverage is filed with the superintendent of public instruction by the school district’s insurance carrier. The insurance coverage must be in the amount required to establish proof of financial responsibility.

A student may not enroll in a driver’s training course through a high school program approved by the superintendent of public instruction unless the student will be at least fourteen years of age by the completion date of the classroom portion of the driver’s training course. A student may not participate in the behind-the-wheel driver’s training portion of the driver’s training course until the student is at least fourteen years of age. A student must complete the driver’s training course’s required amount of behind-the-wheel driver’s training before successfully completing the course.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0605; S.L. 1975, ch. 333, § 1; 1985, ch. 317, § 69; 1987, ch. 458, § 3; 1991, ch. 410, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 10; 2019, ch. 315, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-06-06.
Temporary operator’s permit.

The director may issue a temporary operator’s permit for the operation of a motor vehicle to an applicant for an operator’s license pending an investigation and determination of facts relative to the applicant’s right to receive an operator’s license. The permit must be in the applicant’s immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle and is invalid if the applicant’s license has been issued or denied.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0606; S.L. 1987, ch. 458, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 11.

39-06-07.
Application for operator’s license.

An applicant for an operator’s license must be made upon a form furnished by the director.

An applicant must state on the application the full name, date of birth, sex, social security number, unless the applicant is a nonimmigrant who is not eligible for a social security number or the applicant provides an affidavit stating the applicant was not assigned a social security number, residence and mailing address, and provide a brief description of the applicant. By signing the application the applicant is deemed to have certified that all information contained on the application is true and correct. The application must be accompanied by the fee listed in section 39-06-49. The application must contain any other information as the director may require to improve identity security. The director may require an applicant to provide a social security card and proof of residence address.

If an application is received from an individual previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the director may request a copy of the driver’s record from the other jurisdiction. A copy of another jurisdiction’s driving record becomes a part of the driving record in this state with the same force and effect as though entered on the driving record in this state in the original instance.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0607; S.L. 1963, ch. 278, § 1; 1977, ch. 344, § 1; 1979, ch. 405, §§ 2, 3; 1981, ch. 384, § 2; 1989, ch. 303, § 3; 1999, ch. 141, § 20; 2007, ch. 237, § 5; 2009, ch. 329, § 2; 2011, ch. 271, § 6; 2013, ch. 291, § 12; 2021, ch. 285, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Decisions under Prior Law

Application for Renewal of Driver’s License.

Driver did not present the North Dakota Department of Transportation with a complete application for renewal of his driver’s license containing his social security number, and did not demonstrate a clear legal right to performance of the act sought to be compelled by his petition for a writ of mandamus; the trial court abused its discretion in ordering issuance of a license to the driver without the provision of a social security number. Kouba v. Hoeven, 2004 ND 185, 687 N.W.2d 491, 2004 N.D. LEXIS 312 (N.D. 2004).

39-06-07.1.
Proof of name, date of birth, legal presence, and citizenship for operator’s license application — License difference for citizens and noncitizens — Primary source identity documents.

An applicant must verify the applicant’s name, date of birth, and legal presence on any application by a certified birth certificate or any other documentary evidence that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity, date of birth, legal presence, and citizenship of the applicant. The license issued to a noncitizen of the United States must be designed in a manner to distinguish the license clearly from a similar license issued to a citizen of the United States.

Primary source identity documents retained by the department are not public records.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 334, § 1; 1987, ch. 458, § 5; 1997, ch. 332, § 2; 2009, ch. 329, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 13; 2017, ch. 152, § 11, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 256, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 39-06-07.1 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 11 of Chapter 152, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1369; and Section 4 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1128.

39-06-07.2.
Medical advice — Use by director — Driver’s duty to report certain injuries.

The director is authorized to seek professional medical advice from a licensed medical care provider and to use that advice in decisions made by the director in regard to the issuance, renewal, suspension, revocation, or cancellation of an operator’s license under this chapter. The director may receive advice in any manner.

In addition to advice sought and received under subsection 1, the director may consider information and advice received from an applicant’s or motor vehicle operator’s licensed health care provider. Any examination and report requested by the applicant, motor vehicle operator, or director under this chapter is at the expense of the applicant or motor vehicle operator.

Any licensed health care provider does not incur any liability for any opinion, recommendation, or advice provided to the director under subsection 1.

Advice and information received by the director under subsection 1 which relates to an individual applicant or motor vehicle operator is for the confidential use of the director in making decisions on the individual’s qualifications as a driver, and the information may not be divulged to any person or used in evidence in any trial or proceeding except in matters concerning the individual’s qualifications to receive or retain an operator’s license.

In addition to other sources of information, general advice and information received by the director under this section may be used by the director in the adoption of administrative rules concerning medical criteria for driver licensing.

Before operating any motor vehicle the holder of an operator’s license issued under this chapter who has suffered permanent loss of use of a hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye shall report the loss of use to the director who shall take reasonable action as may be proper under this chapter as to re-examination of the licensee to determine if the licensee is capable of operating vehicles for which the licensee is licensed.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 384, § 1; 1999, ch. 340, § 3; 2011, ch. 273, § 1; 2011, ch; 2013, ch. 291, § 14.

39-06-08.
Application of minors.

The application of any minor for an operator’s license must be signed and verified before an individual authorized to administer oaths or the director, by the father, mother, or legal guardian, or if there is not a parent or legal guardian, then by another responsible adult who is willing to assume the obligation imposed under this chapter upon an individual signing the application of a minor. If the father, mother, or legal guardian is unable to appear, a father, mother, or legal guardian may designate, through a notarized document, an individual temporarily authorized to sign the application.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0608; S.L. 1973, ch. 120, § 36; 1979, ch. 405, § 4; 1997, ch. 332, § 3; 2005, ch. 329, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 15; 2017, ch. 263, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

State’s liability to one injured by improperly licensed driver, 41 A.L.R.4th 111.

39-06-09.
Liability for negligence of minor — General.

Subject to subsection 2, any negligence of a minor when driving a motor vehicle on a highway must be imputed to the individual who signed the application of the minor for an operator’s license, or upon the father, mother, or legal guardian if signing authority has been temporarily transferred under section 39-06-08. This individual is jointly and severally liable with the minor for damages caused by the negligence, except as provided in section 39-06-10.

The negligence of a minor under subsection 1 may not be imputed to the individual who signed the application of the minor for an operator’s license, or upon the father, mother, or legal guardian if signing authority temporarily has been transferred under section 39-06-08 for any injury or damage to that individual which was caused by the minor’s negligence.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0609; S.L. 1973, ch. 120, § 37; 2013, ch. 291, § 16; 2017, ch. 263, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 286, § 1, effective April 13, 2021.

Cross-References.

Liability of parent or child for acts of one another, see § 14-09-21.

39-06-10.
Liability for negligence of minor — Proof of financial responsibility.

If a minor provides proof of financial responsibility for the operation of a motor vehicle, then the director may accept the application of the minor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0610; S.L. 1973, ch. 120, § 38; 1987, ch. 458, § 6; 2013, ch. 291, § 17.

39-06-11.
Cancellation of minor’s license or permit upon request.

An individual who has signed the application of a minor for a license may file with the director a verified written request to cancel the operator’s license of the minor. Upon receipt of the request, the director shall cancel the operator’s license of the minor and the individual who signed the application of the minor is relieved from the liability imposed under this chapter by reason of having signed the application on account of any subsequent negligence of the minor in operating a motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0611; 2013, ch. 291, § 18.

39-06-12.
Cancellation of an operator’s license of a minor upon death of applicant.

The director upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the individual who signed the application of a minor for an operator’s license shall cancel the operator’s license and may not issue a new license until a new application is made by the minor.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0612; 2013, ch. 291, § 19.

39-06-13.
Examination of applicants.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the director shall examine every applicant for an operator’s license. The examination must include a test of the applicant’s eyesight; ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; and knowledge of the traffic laws of this state. The director shall make any written portion of the examination, except writing on illustrations of signs, available to an applicant in any widely practiced language. The director may waive the written portion of the examination for an applicant who has successfully passed a written examination in another state and has an operator’s license that is not or in the process of being revoked, suspended, or canceled.

The director shall establish a process to administer the written portion of an examination for an operator’s license through an online electronic medium. The director shall charge an applicant a fee of ten dollars to access the online written examination. The online examination must:

Use personal questions about the applicant before the examination which the applicant is required to answer during the examination, to strengthen test security to deter fraud; and

Require the applicant’s parent or legal guardian to certify to the department the parent or legal guardian monitored the applicant during the online written examination, before issuance by the department of a class D instruction permit to an applicant who has passed the online examination.

The examination must include an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle unless waived for an applicant who has successfully passed an actual ability test in this or another state conducted by a state licensing authority or by a commercial driver training school meeting the driver education requirements prescribed by the director under chapter 39-25. A minor may operate a motor vehicle no matter how owned for the actual ability test.

In lieu of an eyesight test, the applicant may provide a statement of examination from a licensed physician or an optometrist stating the corrected and uncorrected vision of the applicant, if the examination was within six months of the application.

The director may require any other physical or mental examination.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0613; S.L. 1977, ch. 345, § 1; 1981, ch. 384, § 3; 1987, ch. 459, § 1; 1989, ch. 460, § 4; 1995, ch. 371, § 1; 1997, ch. 333, § 1; 2003, ch. 312, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 20; 2015, ch. 275, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 275, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Re-examination when required by court, see § 39-06-34.1.

39-06-13.1.
Fee for examination of applicants.

An applicant for an operator’s license who is required to be tested to determine the applicant’s knowledge of highway signs, regulating, warning, and directing traffic and of the traffic laws of this state shall pay a fee listed in section 39-06-49.

An applicant for an operator’s license who is required to be tested to demonstrate the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle shall pay a fee listed in section 39-06-49.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 21.

39-06-14.
Licenses issued to operators — General — Classified operator’s license.

Upon the payment of the application fee listed in section 39-06-49, the director shall issue to every qualified applicant an operator’s license. An application for an operator’s license must be made on a form furnished by the director. The operator’s license must bear the full name, date of birth, residence address, and a brief description of the licensee.

The license must bear either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write the licensee’s usual signature. An operator’s license is not valid unless signed by the licensee with the licensee’s usual signature. For purposes of verification, the director may require the licensee to write the licensee’s signature in the presence of the director.

The operator’s license must bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee. The director may not issue a distinguishing number that is, contains, can be converted to, or is an encrypted version of the applicant’s social security number.

The operator’s license must bear a color photograph of the licensee. The director may adopt rules relating to the manner in which photographs are to be obtained and placed on an operator’s license. The photograph may be produced by digital imaging or other electronic means and is not a public record. If the licensee is under the age of eighteen, the photograph must be against a color border or background that is different from the color used for other licensees. If the licensee is at least the age of eighteen and is under the age of twenty-one, the photograph must be against a color border or background that is different from the color used for other licensees.

The director shall issue an operator’s license to any resident who at the time of application is not a citizen of the United States and who fulfills the requirements of this section. The license must be designed in a manner to distinguish the license clearly from a similar license issued to a citizen of the United States and resident of this state. The license issued under this subsection may be replaced with a card issued to a citizen of this country and resident of this state only when proof of United States citizenship is provided by the individual and the replacement fee listed in section 39-06-49 is paid.

Upon request and with adequate documentation, the director shall place an indicator on the face of an operator’s license of a veteran. The veteran may make the request through the department of veterans’ affairs.

An applicant holding a valid operator’s license issued by this state and making application for renewal must be issued a class D license without being subjected to a written or actual ability examination. The director shall issue to any other applicant applying for issuance of an operator’s license a classified license after a successful examination in the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles for the particular class of license and the particular license authorizes the holder to drive the particular class of vehicles as designated in section 39-06.2-09 or this chapter.

An individual with a class D license may operate:

A single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] or less or this vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms] or a combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight or a gross combination weight rating in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] if the individual is eighteen years of age or older, unless the individual is driving a farm vehicle and meets the requirements of subdivision e of subsection 7 of this section and subsection 3 of section 39-06.2-06.

A farm tractor towing another vehicle having a gross weight in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms].

A truck towing a trailer in excess of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms] if the combined weight does not exceed twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] gross combination weight rating.

A house car or a vehicle towing a travel trailer being used solely for personal purposes.

A two-axle or tandem-axle motor vehicle, a triple-axle motor vehicle, and a truck or truck tractor towing a trailer, semitrailer, or farm trailer if the individual is exempted from a commercial driver’s license under subsection 3 of section 39-06.2-06, except the individual may not operate a double trailer or triple trailer and an individual under eighteen years of age may not operate a truck tractor or a bus designed to carry sixteen or more passengers, including the driver.

Any holder of a classified license who drives a motor vehicle otherwise than as permitted by the class of license issued to the holder is deemed to be driving a motor vehicle without being duly licensed. The holder of a classified license who desires to obtain a different class license must exchange or renew the license. The director may adopt rules on renewals or exchanges for the proper administration of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 14; 1957, ch. 261, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0614; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 4; 1967, ch. 306, § 1; 1969, ch. 340, § 2; 1975, ch. 334, § 2; 1975, ch. 335, § 1; 1977, ch. 327, § 6; 1977, ch. 344, § 2; 1977, ch. 345, § 2; 1977, ch. 346, § 1; 1979, ch. 405, § 5; 1979, ch. 409, § 6; 1979, ch. 442, § 6; 1981, ch. 384, § 8; 1983, ch. 414, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 426, § 1; 1985, ch. 427, § 1; 1987, ch. 440, § 4; 1987, ch. 457, § 2; 1989, ch. 303, § 4; 1989, ch. 460, § 5; 1989, ch. 461, § 1; 1995, ch. 372, § 1; 1995, ch. 373, § 1; 1995, ch. 374, § 1; 1997, ch. 332, § 4; 1999, ch. 330, § 5; 1999, ch. 339, § 2; 2001, ch. 339, § 1; 2003, ch. 313, § 1; 2003, ch. 314, § 1; 2007, ch. 237, § 6; 2009, ch. 330, § 2; 2009, ch. 345, § 1; 2011, ch. 274, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 8; 2011, ch. 275, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 22; 2017, ch. 152, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

State’s liability to one injured by improperly licensed driver, 41 A.L.R.4th 111.